Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 33 Perjury and False Swearing

11-33-1.
Perjury.

Every person under oath or affirmation who knowingly makes any false material declaration or makes or uses any other information, including any book, paper, document, record, recording, or other material, knowing it contains any false material declaration, shall be deemed guilty of perjury.

An indictment or information for violation of this section alleging that on oath or affirmation the defendant has knowingly made two (2) or more declarations which are inconsistent to the degree that one of them is necessarily false need not specify which declaration is false if:

Each declaration was material to the point in question; and

Each declaration was made within the period of the statute of limitations established in §

12-12-17

.

In any prosecution under this section, the falsity of a declaration set forth in the indictment or information shall be established sufficient for conviction by proof that the defendant on oath or affirmation made irreconcilably contradictory declarations material to the point in question. It shall be a defense to an indictment or information made pursuant to this subsection that the defendant, at the time he or she made each declaration, believed the declaration was true.

Where in the same continuous court or grand jury proceeding in which a declaration is made, the person making the declaration admits the declaration to be false, that admission shall bar prosecution under this section if, at the time the admission is made, the declaration has not substantially affected the proceeding, or it has not become manifest that the falsity has been or will be exposed.

Proof beyond a reasonable doubt under this section is sufficient for conviction. It shall not be necessary that proof be made by any particular number of witnesses or by documentary or other type of evidence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-33-1

; P.L. 1981, ch. 244, § 1.

11-33-2.
Penalty for perjury.

Every person who shall be guilty of perjury or of subornation of perjury by procuring another to commit perjury, shall be imprisoned not exceeding twenty (20) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-33-2

.

11-33-3.
Attempt to procure perjury.

Every person who shall endeavor to incite or procure another to commit perjury, though the person incited does not commit perjury, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-33-3

.

11-33-4.
False swearing pertaining to sale or conveyance of property.

Every person over the age of eighteen (18) years who shall willfully swear or affirm falsely before any notary public, justice of the peace, or other officer authorized to administer oaths, concerning any material fact relating to any contract, lease, or other document pertaining to the sale or conveyance of real or personal property shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 24; P.L. 1925, ch. 656, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

11-33-4

.

11-33-5.
Manner of proof.

In the trial of any complaint or indictment or information charging any offense under this chapter, the guilt of the accused may be established by circumstantial evidence without regard to the number of witnesses who may testify against the defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 6.

11-33-6.
Perjury before general assembly committees.

Every person who shall testify before any committee, sub-committee, or commission of the general assembly may be required to do so under oath or affirmation by the committee, sub-committee, or commission. If required to testify a stenographic record shall be kept of that testimony after approval by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate.

Any person who shall willfully swear or affirm falsely in regard to any testimony before any committee, sub-committee, or commission of the general assembly shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 7.

11-33-7.
Perjury or false swearing — Child support.

Every person who shall violate any provision of this chapter in any case or controversy involving the abandonment or nonsupport of a child pending before the family court or any other tribunal or agency of competent jurisdiction shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned for a term not to exceed twenty (20) years.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 3.